src/fao-lex.txt
LEXICON s11 ! roykja
standard-j-ir ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s12 ! boyggja
standard-j-ir ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s13 ! søkkja
standard-j-ir ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s14 ! heingja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^EIO prt-d ;
:%^EIO imp-prsprt ;
:%^EIO sup ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s15 ! skeinkja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^EIO prt-d ;
:%^EIO imp-prsprt ;
:%^EIO sup ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s16 ! flekja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s17 ! berja
jinf ;
pres-ir ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s18 ! krevja
jinf ;
pres-ur ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s19 ! dylja
jinf ;
pres-ur ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s20 ! leggja
:%>d l8 ;

LEXICON s21 ! selja
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s22 ! ryðja
jinf ;
pres-ur ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s23 ! smyrja
jinf ;
pres-null ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s24 ! flysa
jinf ;
pres-null ;
:%^WVV prt-d ;
:%^WVV imp-prsprt ;
:%^WVV sup ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s25 ! liva
inf ;
pres-ir ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsprt ;
:a sup-a ;
:%>d l6 ;

LEXICON s26 ! plaga
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsprt ;
sup ;
:a sup-a ;

LEXICON s27 ! spáa
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-dd ;
imp-prsprt ;
sup-tt ;
:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s28 ! skaða
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsprt ;
sup ;
:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s29 ! brúka
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsprt ;
sup ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s30 ! kalla
inf ;
pres-ar ;
prt-a ;
:a impsg ; !deviant kalla
imppl ;
prsptc ;
sup-a ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s31 ! gera
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s32 ! búgva
:%>d l32 ;

LEXICON s33 ! rógva
:%>d l32 ;

LEXICON s34 ! goyggja
# ;

LEXICON s35 ! bíta
:%>d l26 ;

LEXICON s36 ! svíkja
:%>d l26 ;

LEXICON s37 ! bróta
:%>d l26 ;

LEXICON s38 ! skjóta
:%>d l26 ;

LEXICON s39 ! bjóða
:%>d l26 ;

LEXICON s40 ! fúka
:%>d l26 ;

LEXICON s41 ! flúgva
l26 ;

LEXICON s42 ! klúgva
l26 ;

LEXICON s43 ! njóta
l26 ;

LEXICON s44 ! finna
l26 ;

LEXICON s45 ! binda
l26 ;

LEXICON s46 ! stinga
l26 ;

LEXICON s47 ! svimja
l26 ;

LEXICON s48 ! drekka
l26 ;

LEXICON s49 ! detta
l26 ;

LEXICON s50 ! røkka
l26 ;

LEXICON s51 ! ganga
l26 ;

LEXICON s52 ! veva
l26 ;

LEXICON s53 ! leypa
l26 ;

LEXICON s54 ! bera
l26 ;

LEXICON s55 ! fara
l26 ;

LEXICON s56 ! geva
l26 ;

LEXICON s57 ! sita
l26 ;

LEXICON s58 ! mala
l26 ;

LEXICON s59 ! stjala
l26 ;

LEXICON s60 ! taka
l26 ;

LEXICON s61 ! halda
l26 ;

LEXICON s62 ! sova
l26 ;

LEXICON s63 ! koma
l26 ;

LEXICON s64 ! láta
l26 ;

LEXICON s65 ! standa
l26 ;

LEXICON s66 ! biðja
l26 ;

LEXICON s67 ! draga
l26 ;

LEXICON s68 ! hvørva
l26 ;

LEXICON s69 ! sláa
l26 ;

LEXICON s70 ! siga
l26 ;

LEXICON s71 ! skerja
l26 ;

LEXICON s72 ! eta
l26 ;

LEXICON s73 ! læa
l26 ;

LEXICON s74 ! grindast
# ;

LEXICON s75 ! balast
# ;

LEXICON s76 ! ræðast
# ;

LEXICON s77 ! minnast
# ;

LEXICON s78 ! farast
# ;

LEXICON s79 ! skjótast
# ;

LEXICON s80 ! trivast
# ;

LEXICON s81 ! kíkjast
# ;

LEXICON s82 ! f´ylast
# ;






! Intermediate lexicon groups

LEXICON standard-ir
 inf ;
 ir-verb ;

LEXICON standard-j-ir
jinf ;
ir-verb ;

LEXICON ir-verb
pres-ir ;
prt-d ;
imp-prsprt ;
sup ;


! Suffix lexica
! =============

! Infinitive

LEXICON jinf
+V+Inf:%>ja # ;

LEXICON inf
+V+Inf:%>a # ;


! Present

LEXICON pres-ir
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ir # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ir # ;

LEXICON pres-ar
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>a # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ar # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ar # ;

LEXICON pres-ur
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ur # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ur # ;

LEXICON pres-null
+V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%> # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%> # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%> # ;


! Preterite

LEXICON prt-d
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>di # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>du # ;

LEXICON prt-dd
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>ddi # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>ddu # ;

LEXICON prt-a
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg:%>ði # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl:%>ðu # ;


! Imperative and present participle

LEXICON imp-prsprt
impsg ;
imppl ;
prsptc ;

LEXICON impsg
+V+Imp+Sg: # ;

LEXICON imppl
+V+Imp+Pl:%>ið # ;

LEXICON prsptc
+V+PrsPtc:%>andi # ;

 
! Supine and preterite participle
 
LEXICON sup
+V+Sup:%>t # ;
+V+PrtPtc:%>dur # ;

LEXICON sup-tt
+V+Sup:%>tt # ;
+V+PrtPtc:%>ddur # ;

LEXICON sup-a ! kalla
+V+Sup:%>ð # ;
+V+PrtPtc:%>ður # ;
